apertium-id-ms.id.lexc
! Root node
LEXICON Root
<aku%<prn%>%<pro%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%+:ku          "@P.FLAG.verbinfl@">       VerbInflection ;
<aku%<prn%>%<pro%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<cap%>%+:Ku   "@P.FLAG.verbinfl@">       VerbInflection ;
<kamu%<prn%>%<pro%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%+:kau        "@P.FLAG.verbinfl@">       VerbInflection ;
<kamu%<prn%>%<pro%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<cap%>%+:Kau "@P.FLAG.verbinfl@">       VerbInflection ;
<"@P.CAP.on@">                        MainWord ;
                                                      MainWord ;


Lexicon MainWord
<"@P.FLAG.numinfl@">        NumeralInflection ;
<"@P.FLAG.deradj@">         DerivingAdjective ;
<"@P.FLAG.dernoun@">        DerivingNoun-Singular ;
<"@P.FLAG.dernoun@">        DerivingNoun-Plural ;
<"@P.FLAG.verbinfl@">       VerbInflection ;
                            Pronoun ;
                            Subordinating ;
                            Determiner ;





!!---- Prefixes ----!!

Lexicon NumeralInflection
<"@P.MARK.bare@">                                                           Numeral ;
<0:k 0:e  "@P.MARK.ke@">                                                    Numeral ;
<0:k 0:e  "@P.MARK.ke@" "@P.REDUP.on@" [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{"]>                Numeral ;
<0:b 0:er "@P.MARK.ber@">                                                   Numeral ;

Lexicon DerivingAdjective
<0:k 0:e  "@P.MARK.ke@">                                                    Noun ;
<0:k 0:e  "@P.MARK.ke@">                                                    Adjective ;
<0:t 0:er "@P.MARK.ter@">                                                   Adjective ;
<"@P.MARK.bare@">                                                           Adjective ;
<"@P.MARK.bare@""@P.REDUP.on@" [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{"]>                        Adjective ;

Lexicon DerivingNoun-Singular
<"@P.NUM.sg@">                                                              DerivingNoun-main ;

Lexicon DerivingNoun-Plural
<"@P.MARK.bare@" "@P.REDUP.on@" [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{"]>                       Verb ;
<"@P.MARK.bare@" "@P.REDUP.on@" [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{"]>                       Noun ;
<"@P.MARK.bare@" "@P.REDUP.on@" [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{"]>                       Adjective ;
<"@P.MARK.bare@" "@P.REDUP.on@" [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{"]>                       Numeral ;
<"@P.MARK.pen@" "@P.DERNOUN.actor@" "@P.REDUP.on@" [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{" p e "^N"]>        Verb ;
<"@P.MARK.pen@" "@P.DERNOUN.actor@" "@P.REDUP.on@" [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{" p e "^N"]>        Noun ;
<"@P.MARK.pen@" "@P.DERNOUN.actor@" "@P.REDUP.on@" [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{" p e "^N"]>        Adjective ;
<"@P.MARK.pen@" "@P.DERNOUN.actor@" "@P.REDUP.on@" [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{" p e "^N"]>        Numeral ;
<"@P.REDUP.on@" [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{" k e] "@P.MARK.ke@">                     Adjective ;
<"@P.REDUP.on@" [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{" p e r] "@P.MARK.per@">                  Noun ;
<"@P.REDUP.on@" [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{" p e r] "@P.MARK.per@">                  Adjective ;
<"@P.REDUP.on@" [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{" p e r] "@P.MARK.per@">                  Numeral ;

Lexicon DerivingNoun-main
<"@P.MARK.bare@">                                                          Verb ;
<"@P.MARK.bare@">                                                          Noun ;
<"@P.MARK.bare@">                                                          Adjective ;
<"@P.MARK.bare@">                                                          Numeral ;
<"@P.MARK.pen@" "@P.DERNOUN.actor@" [0 .x. p e "^N"]>                      Verb ;
<"@P.MARK.pen@" "@P.DERNOUN.actor@" [0 .x. p e "^N"]>                      Noun ;
<"@P.MARK.pen@" "@P.DERNOUN.actor@" [0 .x. p e "^N"]>                      Adjective ;
<"@P.MARK.pen@" "@P.DERNOUN.actor@" [0 .x. p e "^N"]>                      Numeral ;
<0:k 0:e  "@P.MARK.ke@">                                                   Adjective ;
<0:p 0:er "@P.MARK.per@">                                                  Noun ;
<0:p 0:er "@P.MARK.per@">                                                  Adjective ;
<0:p 0:er "@P.MARK.per@">                                                  Numeral ;


Lexicon VerbInflection
<"@P.VOICE.av@" "@P.ASPECT.perf@"   "@P.NUM.sg@">                                                            Verb ;
<"@P.VOICE.av@" "@P.ASPECT.perf@"   "@P.REDUP.on@" [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{"]>                                     Verb ;
<"@P.VOICE.av@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.NUM.sg@"   [0 .x. m e "^N"]>                                         Verb ;
<"@P.VOICE.av@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.REDUP.on@" [0 .x. m e "^N" "^[" "[" "{"]>                            Verb ;
<"@P.VOICE.av@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.NUM.sg@"   [0 .x. m e "^N"]>                                         Noun ;
<"@P.VOICE.av@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.REDUP.on@" [0 .x. m e "^N" "^[" "[" "{"]>                            Noun ;
<"@P.VOICE.av@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.NUM.sg@"   [0 .x. m e "^N"]>                                         Adjective ;
<"@P.VOICE.av@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.REDUP.on@" [0 .x. m e "^N" "^[" "[" "{"]>                            Adjective ;
<"@P.VOICE.av@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.NUM.sg@"   [0 .x. m e "^N"]>                                         Numeral ;
<"@P.VOICE.av@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.REDUP.on@" [0 .x. m e "^N" "^[" "[" "{"]>                            Numeral ;
<"@P.VOICE.pv@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.NUM.sg@"   0:d 0:i>                                                  Verb ;
<"@P.VOICE.pv@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.REDUP.on@" 0:d 0:i [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{"]>                             Verb ;
<"@P.VOICE.pv@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.NUM.sg@"   0:d 0:i>                                                  Noun ;
<"@P.VOICE.pv@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.REDUP.on@" 0:d 0:i [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{"]>                             Noun ;
<"@P.VOICE.pv@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.NUM.sg@"   0:d 0:i>                                                  Adjective ;
<"@P.VOICE.pv@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.REDUP.on@" 0:d 0:i [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{"]>                             Adjective ;
<"@P.VOICE.pv@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.NUM.sg@"   0:d 0:i>                                                  Numeral ;
<"@P.VOICE.pv@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.REDUP.on@" 0:d 0:i [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{"]>                             Numeral ;
<"@P.VOICE.pv@" "@P.ASPECT.perf@" "@P.NUM.sg@"   0:t 0:er>                                                   Verb ;
<"@P.VOICE.pv@" "@P.ASPECT.perf@" "@P.REDUP.on@" 0:t 0:er [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{"]>                              Verb ;
<"@P.VOICE.pv@" "@P.ASPECT.perf@" "@P.NUM.sg@"   0:t 0:er>                                                   Noun ;
<"@P.VOICE.pv@" "@P.ASPECT.perf@" "@P.REDUP.on@" 0:t 0:er [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{"]>                              Noun ;
<"@P.VOICE.av@" "@P.ASPECT.perf@" "@P.VERBVAR.vbser@" "@P.NUM.sg@"   0:p 0:er>                               Adjective ;
<"@P.VOICE.av@" "@P.ASPECT.perf@" "@P.VERBVAR.vbser@" "@P.REDUP.on@" 0:p 0:er>                               Adjective ;
<"@P.VOICE.av@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.VERBVAR.vbser@" "@P.NUM.sg@"   0:m 0:emper>                          Adjective ;
<"@P.VOICE.av@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.VERBVAR.vbser@" "@P.REDUP.on@" 0:m 0:emper [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{"]>     Adjective ;
<"@P.VOICE.av@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.VERBVAR.vbser@" "@P.NUM.sg@"   0:m 0:emper>                          Verb ;
<"@P.VOICE.av@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.VERBVAR.vbser@" "@P.REDUP.on@" 0:m 0:emper [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{"]>     Verb ;
<"@P.VOICE.pv@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.VERBVAR.vbser@" "@P.NUM.sg@"   0:d 0:iper>                           Adjective ;
<"@P.VOICE.pv@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.VERBVAR.vbser@" "@P.REDUP.on@" 0:d 0:iper [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{"]>      Adjective ;
<"@P.VOICE.pv@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.VERBVAR.vbser@" "@P.NUM.sg@"   0:d 0:iper>                           Verb ;
<"@P.VOICE.pv@" "@P.ASPECT.imperf@" "@P.VERBVAR.vbser@" "@P.REDUP.on@" 0:d 0:iper [0 .x. "^[" "[" "{"]>      Verb ;
<"@P.VOICE.av@" "@P.ASPECT.perf@" "@P.VERBVAR.vbhaver@" "@P.NUM.sg@"   0:b 0:er "@P.FLAG.dernoun@">          DerivingNoun-Singular ;
<"@P.VOICE.av@" "@P.ASPECT.perf@" "@P.VERBVAR.vbhaver@" "@P.NUM.sg@"   0:b 0:er "@P.FLAG.dernoun@">          DerivingNoun-Plural ;



!!---- Suffixes ----!!
Lexicon InflectionOption
<"@R.FLAG.numinfl@">        NumeralInflectionEnding ;
<"@R.FLAG.deradj@">         DerivingAdjectiveEnding ;
<"@R.FLAG.dernoun@">        DerivingNounEnding ;
<"@R.FLAG.verbinfl@">       VerbInflectionEnding ;
<"@D.FLAG@">                Tagging ;


Lexicon NumeralInflectionEnding
<      "@D.REDUP@" "@R.MARK.bare@" "@P.DERNUM.car@">            Tagging ;
<      "@D.REDUP@" "@R.MARK.ke@"   "@P.DERNUM.ord@">            Tagging ;
<0:nya "@D.REDUP@" "@R.MARK.ke@"   "@P.DERNUM.ref@">            Tagging ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@R.MARK.ke@" "@P.DERNUM.ref@" 0:nya>        Tagging ;
<      "@D.REDUP@" "@R.MARK.ber@" "@P.DERNUM.coll@">            Tagging ;

Lexicon DerivingAdjectiveEnding
<0:an "@D.REDUP@" "@R.MARK.ke@"   "@R.POS.n@"   "@P.DERADJ.manner@">         Tagging ;
<0:an "@D.REDUP@" "@R.MARK.ke@"   "@R.POS.adj@" "@P.DERADJ.exceed@">         Tagging ;
<     "@D.REDUP@" "@R.MARK.ter@"  "@R.POS.adj@" "@P.DERADJ.sup@">            Tagging ;
<     "@D.REDUP@" "@R.MARK.bare@" "@R.POS.adj@" "@P.DERADJ.positive@">       Tagging ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.NUM.pl@""@R.MARK.bare@" "@R.POS.adj@" "@P.DERADJ.positive@">      Tagging ;

Lexicon DerivingNounEnding
<     "@R.MARK.bare@" "@R.POS.n@" "@P.DERNOUN.bare@">   LastReduplicationCheck ;
<0:an "@R.MARK.bare@" "@P.DERNOUN.ent@">                LastReduplicationCheck ;
<0:an "@R.MARK.pen@"   "@P.DERNOUN.act@">               LastReduplicationCheck ;
<     "@R.MARK.pen@">                                   LastReduplicationCheck ;
<0:an "@R.MARK.ke@"    "@P.DERNOUN.abstract@">          LastReduplicationCheck ;
<0:an "@R.MARK.per@"   "@P.DERNOUN.theme@">             LastReduplicationCheck ;


Lexicon VerbInflectionEnding
<"@D.REDUP@">                                                                            VerbInflectionEnding-main ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.NUM.pl@">        VerbInflectionEnding-main ;
!<[0 .x. "%^REHYPH" ">>"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.NUM.pl@">                     VerbInflectionEnding-main ;

Lexicon VerbInflectionEnding-main
<0:kan "@P.OBJ.caus@">            Tagging ;
<0:i   "@P.OBJ.appl@">            Tagging ;
                                  Tagging ;

Lexicon LastReduplicationCheck
<"@D.REDUP@">        Tagging ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.NUM.pl@">        LastReduplicationCheck ;






!!---- Tagging ----!!
Lexicon Tagging
<[%<v%> .x. 0]      "@R.POS.v@">                   CheckVoice ;
<[%<n%> .x. 0]      "@R.POS.n@">                   CheckVoice ;
<[%<adj%> .x. 0]    "@R.POS.adj@">	           CheckVoice ;
<[%<num%> .x. 0]    "@R.POS.num@">	           CheckVoice ;
<[%<prn%> .x. 0]    "@R.POS.prn@">		   CheckVoice ;
<[%<cnjsub%> .x. 0] "@R.POS.cnjsub@">              CheckVoice ;
<[%<cnjcoo%> .x. 0] "@R.POS.cnjcoo@">	           CheckVoice ;
<[%<det%> .x. 0]    "@R.POS.det@">	           CheckVoice ;

Lexicon CheckVoice
<[%<av%> .x. 0] "@R.VOICE.av@">		           CheckAspect ;
<[%<pv%> .x. 0] "@R.VOICE.pv@">                    CheckAspect ;
<"@D.VOICE@">                                      CheckAspect ;

Lexicon CheckAspect
<[%<perf%> .x. 0] "@R.ASPECT.perf@">		   CheckVerbVariance ;
<[%<imp%> .x. 0] "@R.ASPECT.imperf@">		   CheckVerbVariance ;
<"@D.ASPECT@">                                     CheckVerbVariance ;

Lexicon CheckVerbVariance
<[%<vbser%> .x. 0]   "@R.VERBVAR.vbser@">          CheckTransitivity ;
<[%<vbhaver%> .x. 0] "@R.VERBVAR.vbhaver@">        CheckTransitivity ;
<"@D.VERBVAR@">                                    CheckTransitivity ;


Lexicon CheckTransitivity
<[%<caus%> .x. 0] "@R.OBJ.caus@">		   CheckDerNoun ;
<[%<appl%> .x. 0] "@R.OBJ.appl@">		   CheckDerNoun ;
<"@D.OBJ@">                                        CheckDerNoun ;
